Hawaii statutes.
§476-12 Payment without notice of
assignment. Unless the buyer has notice of actual assignment of a credit
sale contract, payment thereunder made by the buyer to the last known holder of
the contract shall be binding upon all subsequent holders or assignees. The
notice may be given by first class mail to the address of the buyer as shown in
the contract or to the last known address of the buyer. [L 1961, c 102, pt of
§1; Supp, §201A-9; HRS §476-10; am and ren L 1984, c 86, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next